South Dakota, session 2026, HB1278.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 12-27:
Neither the candidate campaign committee of a state official nor a political action
committee affiliated with a state official may accept a contribution from a state employee
who is employed or appointed by the official and:
(1) Is the head of a department or agency of state government;
(2) Is the highest paid employee, not including the head, in the department or agency;
or
(3) Reports directly to the official.
For purposes of this section, "state official" means the Governor, lieutenant
governor, secretary of state, auditor, treasurer, attorney general, commissioner of school
and public lands, a commissioner with the Public Utilities Commission of the State of South
Dakota, or a member of the Legislature.
Section 2. This Act is effective beginning January 1, 2027.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.